Utah statutes.
77-34-7.   Costs and expenses.

(1) Costs arising out of a grant of a furlough for transportation, lodgings, meals, and other related expenses shall be the sole responsibility of the furloughee; however, in the event that the furloughee is financially unable to pay for these expenses, such costs may be assumed by the sending state.

(2)  Extraordinary costs, other than those specified in Subsection (1) arising from the grant of furlough among party states shall be the sole responsibility of the sending state. Such costs will generally be confined to emergency medical and special confinement and transportation needs.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

